Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [169.251] COMMERCIAL AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE OPERATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Autonomous vehicle" means a vehicle equipped with technology that has been integrated into the vehicle that meets the definition of Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 in the April 2021 revision of standard J3016, "Taxonomy and Definitions for Terms Related to Driving Automation Systems for On-Road Motor Vehicles," published by SAE International. new text end new text begin (c) "Commercial autonomous vehicle operations" means the use of autonomous vehicles for commercial purposes, including but not limited to transporting passengers or goods. new text end new text begin (d) "Advisory board" means the Commercial Autonomous Vehicle Operations Labor and Small Business Impact Advisory Board established under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (e) "Human safety operator" means a natural person who is properly licensed to operate the vehicle and is seated in the driver seat of the vehicle. new text end new text begin (f) "Transportation network company" has the meaning given in section 65B.472, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Operation limitations. new text end new text begin Commercial autonomous vehicle operations are prohibited in Minnesota until the study set forth in subdivision 5 is completed and the commercial autonomous vehicle operations permit process has been established by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision 3. No entity may begin commercial autonomous vehicle operations without a permit issued by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Permit process. new text end new text begin The commissioner must develop a commercial autonomous vehicle operations permit process based on the study and recommendations provided pursuant to subdivision 5. The permit process must include, at a minimum, an individual evaluation of every permit applicant conducted by the advisory board under subdivision 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Advisory board; members. new text end new text begin (a) The Commercial Autonomous Vehicle Operations Labor and Small Business Impact Advisory Board is established to evaluate commercial autonomous vehicle operations permit applications and provide recommendations to the commissioner. The advisory board is composed of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner or a designee; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of public safety or a designee; new text end new text begin (3) the commissioner of commerce or a designee; new text end new text begin (4) the attorney general or a designee; new text end new text begin (5) one member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house; new text end new text begin (6) one member of the senate appointed by the senate majority leader; new text end new text begin (7) one representative from the driver workforce in the private sector appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (8) one representative from the driver workforce in the public sector appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (9) one rideshare driver appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (10) one representative from the disability rights community appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (11) one representative from a municipal government appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (12) one representative from a consumer rights advocacy group appointed by the governor; and new text end new text begin (13) one representative from an autonomous vehicle company appointed by the governor. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioners or their designees appointed under paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (3), must serve as cochairs of the advisory board. new text end new text begin (c) The Department of Transportation must provide administrative, staffing, and technical support to the advisory board. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Commercial autonomous vehicle operations study. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory board must enlist an independent research institution with expertise in rideshare labor economics to conduct a comprehensive review of commercial autonomous vehicle operations and evaluate its potential deployment in Minnesota. The review must include but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) an independent economic impact study to determine the short- and long-term effects of commercial autonomous vehicle operations on rideshare drivers and commercial drivers and workforce displacement projections; new text end new text begin (2) economic impacts on transportation network company drivers; new text end new text begin (3) reemployment pathways for displaced rideshare drivers and commercial drivers; new text end new text begin (4) economic displacement impacts on businesses that serve rideshare drivers and commercial drivers; new text end new text begin (5) financial impacts on Minnesota, including those due to reduction in tax revenues; new text end new text begin (6) accessibility offerings and supports for people with disabilities; new text end new text begin (7) legal liability in the event of a collision; new text end new text begin (8) algorithmic management, including requiring public notification for any changes to the algorithm that could impact how autonomous vehicles interact with other vehicles or pedestrians; new text end new text begin (9) financial and infrastructure impacts on cities and the state; new text end new text begin (10) development of a certification process not overseen by the autonomous vehicle industry; new text end new text begin (11) potential for interference with first responders; new text end new text begin (12) an evaluation of autonomous vehicles' ability to navigate city streets; and new text end new text begin (13) an assessment of congestion impacts of commercial autonomous vehicle operations. new text end new text begin (b) The advisory board must hold public hearings subject to the Open Meeting Law under chapter 13D to obtain testimony from rideshare drivers, commercial drivers, and members of the public. The advisory board must accept public comment for no fewer than 30 days after the release of any preliminary findings. new text end new text begin (c) By February 1, 2027, the advisory board must publish a final report on the Department of Transportation's website. The report must include recommendations to the commissioner on whether commercial autonomous vehicle operations should be allowed to operate in Minnesota and potential requirements for a permit process to authorize commercial autonomous vehicle operations. new text end new text begin (d) This subdivision expires February 1, 2027, or upon publication of the report required under paragraph (c), whichever is later. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Permit applicant studies. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory board must evaluate every applicant for a commercial autonomous vehicle operations permit before a permit may be issued. For each region in which the applicant seeks to operate, the advisory board must evaluate: new text end new text begin (1) economic impacts on transportation network company drivers; new text end new text begin (2) reemployment pathways for displaced rideshare drivers and commercial drivers; new text end new text begin (3) economic displacement impacts on businesses that serve rideshare drivers and commercial drivers; new text end new text begin (4) financial impacts, including those due to reduction in tax revenues; new text end new text begin (5) accessibility offerings and supports for people with disabilities; new text end new text begin (6) legal liability in the event of a collision; new text end new text begin (7) algorithmic management, including requiring public notification for any changes to the algorithm that could impact how autonomous vehicles interact with other vehicles or pedestrians; new text end new text begin (8) financial and infrastructure impacts; new text end new text begin (9) potential for interference with first responders; new text end new text begin (10) autonomous vehicles' ability to navigate; and new text end new text begin (11) congestion impacts. new text end new text begin (b) Based on the results of the evaluation under paragraph (a), the advisory board must provide a nonbinding recommendation to the commissioner whether or not to approve the application. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Human safety operator. new text end new text begin A commercial autonomous vehicle operations permit issued by the commissioner must include the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) an autonomous vehicle must not transport passengers or goods unless a human safety operator is physically present in the vehicle and has the ability at all times to monitor the performance of the vehicle and intervene if necessary, including but not limited to taking over immediate manual control of the vehicle or shutting off the vehicle; and new text end new text begin (2) autonomous vehicles and human safety operators must meet all applicable local, state, and federal requirements. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Severability. new text end new text begin If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid for any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or any other application of this section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end